Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-7013
Immunity from liability; when.

The State of Nebraska and the department and its employees shall not be liable for any damage or injury resulting from (1) a false negative result or a false positive result interpretation or any other act or omission of an interpreting physician with respect to any screening performed pursuant to sections 71-7001.01 and 71-7003.01 or (2) any act or omission of a screening supplier or person acting on behalf of such supplier with respect to the provisions of such sections.

Laws 1991, LB 256, § 13;

Laws 1995, LB 68, § 11;

Laws 2008, LB797, § 26;

Laws 2026, LB905, § 29.
July 1, 2026